Hawaii statutes.
§671-16 Subsequent litigation; excluded
evidence. [(a)] The party initiating the inquiry may institute litigation
based upon the circumstances of the inquiry in an appropriate court only after
the medical inquiry and conciliation panel proceedings were terminated pursuant
to section 671-15; a party has participated in alternative dispute resolution
pursuant to section 671-16.6; or the twelve-month period under section 671-18
has expired.

[(b)] No statement made in the course of the
proceedings of the medical inquiry and conciliation panel shall be admissible
in evidence either as an admission, to impeach the credibility of a witness, or
for any other purpose in any trial of the action; provided that the statements
may be admissible for the purpose of section 671-19. No decision, conclusion,
finding, statement, or recommendation of the medical inquiry and conciliation
panel on the issue of liability or on the issue of damages shall be admitted
into evidence in any subsequent trial, nor shall any party to the medical
inquiry and conciliation panel proceeding, or the counsel or other
representative of a party, refer or comment thereon in an opening statement, an
argument, or at any other time, to the court or jury; provided that the
decision, conclusion, finding, or recommendation may be admissible for the
purpose of section 671-19. [L 1976, c 219, pt of §2; am L 1980, c 88, §3; am L
2003, c 211, §3 ; am L 2012, c 296, pt of §4]

Case Notes

Claim was allowed to be heard because there was substantial
compliance with procedural requirements. 69 H. 305, 741 P.2d 1280 (1987).

Where certain counts of plaintiff's complaint alleged errors
or omissions in professional practice by a health care provider, thus falling
under the definition of "medical tort" under §671-1(2), court
properly ruled plaintiff could not proceed with those counts of suit without
first submitting them to medical claim conciliation panel as required by
§671-12 and this section. 89 H. 188, 970 P.2d 496 (1998).

Where plaintiff chose to sidestep requirements of §671-12 and
this section by filing suit before seeking resolution of claims by a medical
claim conciliation panel as required under these statutes, court properly
dismissed complaint. 89 H. 188, 970 P.2d 496 (1998).

Plaintiff's claims of neglect, abuse, and failure to provide
a safe home against care home defendants did not constitute "medical torts"
within the meaning of §671-1; thus, plaintiff was not required to submit
plaintiff's claims to a medical claim conciliation panel (MCCP) pursuant to
§671-12 and this section as a condition for plaintiff to file suit against
defendants, and the circuit court erred in dismissing plaintiff's suit based on
plaintiff's failure to submit plaintiff's claims to a MCCP. 128 H. 405 (App.),
289 P.3d 1041 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next